Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
408

FINANCIAL
SERVICES LOAN COMPANIES

REPEALED. L 1993, c 350, §39.

Note

L 1993, c 6, §29 purports to amend §408-14.

Cross References

For present provisions, see chapter 412.

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next